Vermont, session 2025-2026, H885.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds:
(1) Vermont has a severe deficit of affordable housing, and as a result,
72 percent of renter households are severely cost burdened and at risk of
homelessness.
(2) Homelessness in Vermont has increased by over 300 percent since
the pandemic in 2020, resulting in at least 4,588 Vermonters, including more
than 1,041 children, experiencing homelessness as of June 2025.
(3) Vermont has insufficient beds in community-based shelters to meet
the volume of need, leaving thousands of Vermonters experiencing
homelessness with nowhere to go.
(4) Significant cuts to Vermont’s General Assistance emergency
housing system and strict requirements on program eligibility have contributed
to a rise in unsheltered homelessness by approximately 62 percent from the
2024 to the 2025 point-in-time count.
(5) People experiencing homelessness who are unsheltered struggle for
daily survival, including finding relief from the elements, securing food, and
keeping their personal possessions safe.
(6) State and local governments, after failing to develop adequate
affordable housing and shelter response systems, must not put people in even
VT LEG #386303 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.885
2026 Page 3 of 14
greater jeopardy by affording neighbors who are unsheltered the ability to
secure themselves in makeshift homes in stable and safe public spaces.
(7) Punishing individuals who have nowhere to go undermines public
safety and does not stop homelessness from occurring; the criminalization of
individuals experiencing homelessness forces people to lose employment,
homes, student loans, and financial assistance, and makes access to housing,
gainful employment, education, and public assistance extraordinarily difficult
for individuals reentering the community from the criminal and juvenile justice
systems or with criminal records, thereby contributing to higher recidivism
rates and exacerbating the homelessness crisis.
Sec. 2. 24 V.S.A. § 2295a is added to read:
§ 2295a. AUTHORITY OF MUNICIPAL AND COUNTY GOVERNMENTS
TO REGULATE THE USE OF MUNICIPAL OR COUNTY
PROPERTY FOR LIFE-SUSTAINING ACTIVITIES
(a) For purposes of this section:
(1) “Adequate alternative indoor space” means a space that is legally
and physically accessible to an individual, and which does not require the
individual to sacrifice any other personal right afforded to the individual under
federal, State, or local law.
(2) “Alternative indoor space” means permanent housing, transitional
housing, community-based shelter, or other temporary emergency shelter that
VT LEG #386303 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.885
2026 Page 4 of 14
is accessible to the household and located in their community of choice and
allows an individual’s household to remain intact. “Alternative indoor space”
does not include indoor space in a neighboring jurisdiction, unless the
individual has requested placement in a neighboring jurisdiction. “Alternative
indoor space” may include tiny homes or similar structures, provided the tiny
home has locking doors, adequate heating systems, and includes either both
sanitary and cooking facilities or access to common facilities that are sufficient
for the community’s population.
(3) “Life-sustaining activities” includes moving, resting, sitting,
standing, lying down, sleeping, protecting oneself from the elements, eating,
drinking, engaging in self-regulating and other adaptive behaviors, and storing
such personal property as needed to safely shelter oneself.
(b) Except as otherwise provided by law, no municipality or county shall
regulate or prohibit the use of municipal property for life-sustaining activities.
(c) This section shall not apply to a municipality that:
(1) has sufficient adequate alternative indoor spaces available to
individuals experiencing homelessness within the municipality; or
(2) has designated a municipal growth center, downtown, or village
center as available to individuals experiencing homeless for life-sustaining
activities.
VT LEG #386303 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.885
2026 Page 5 of 14
Sec. 3. SUPERSEDED ACTS; PREEMPTION; CONSTRUCTION
The provisions of Sec. 2. of this act shall supersede any conflicting
provisions of a municipal or educational charter, or a municipal ordinance,
bylaw, or rule.
Sec. 4. 24 V.S.A. § 2295b is added to read:
§ 2295b. ENFORCEMENT AND RIGHT OF ACTION
(a) The Attorney General may commence a civil action on behalf of the
State of Vermont against any municipality or municipal official that violates
the provisions of section 2295a of this subchapter. The Attorney General may
seek a declaration that any municipal ordinance, policy, procedure, or practice
is unlawful and in violation of section 2295a of this subchapter, and may seek
an order enjoining the ordinance, policy, procedure, or practice.
(b) The Human Rights Commission shall have jurisdiction to investigate
and enforce complaints of unlawful discrimination based on housing status in
violation of 9 V.S.A. chapter 139 (discrimination in public accommodations
and rental and sale of real estate).
(c) Any individual adversely affected by an alleged violation of section
2295a of this subchapter may commence a civil action against the State or its
political subdivisions or against any government official who violates a
provision of section 2295a of this subchapter.
VT LEG #386303 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.885
2026 Page 6 of 14
(d) In any action under this section, the court may award appropriate
equitable relief, including temporary, preliminary, or permanent injunctive
relief.
(e) In any action under this section, the court shall award costs of litigation,
as well as reasonable attorney’s fees, to any prevailing plaintiff. A plaintiff
shall not be liable to a defendant for costs or attorney’s fees in any
nonfrivolous action under this section.
(f) The Civil Division of the Superior Court shall have jurisdiction over
proceedings under this section and shall exercise jurisdiction without regard to
whether the aggrieved party shall have exhausted any administrative or other
remedies that may be provided for by law.
(g) Neither a municipal government that enforces or maintains, nor a
government official who is permitted to implement or enforce, any limitation
or requirement that violates this chapter shall be immune under the 10th
Amendment to the U.S. Constitution, the 11th Amendment to the U.S.
Constitution, or any other source of law from an action in a federal or State
court of competent jurisdiction challenging that limitation or requirement.
Sec. 5. 9 V.S.A. § 4501 is amended to read:
§ 4501. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
VT LEG #386303 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.885
2026 Page 7 of 14
(14) “Housing status” means the actual or perceived status of being
homeless, being an individual experiencing homelessness, or being a homeless
person as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 11302.
Sec. 6. 9 V.S.A. § 4502 is amended to read:
§ 4502. PUBLIC ACCOMMODATIONS
(a) An owner or operator of a place of public accommodation or an agent
or employee of such owner or operator shall not, because of the race, creed,
color, national origin, citizenship, immigration status, housing status, marital
status, sex, sexual orientation, or gender identity of any person, refuse,
withhold from, or deny to that person any of the accommodations, advantages,
facilities, and privileges of the place of public accommodation.
* * *
Sec. 7. 9 V.S.A. § 4503 is amended to read:
§ 4503. UNFAIR HOUSING PRACTICES
(a) It shall be unlawful for any person:
(1) To refuse to sell or rent, or refuse to negotiate for the sale or rental
of, or otherwise make unavailable or deny, a dwelling or other real estate to
any person because of the race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age,
marital status, religious creed, color, national origin, citizenship, immigration
status, housing status, or disability of a person, or because a person intends to
occupy a dwelling with one or more minor children, or because a person is a
VT LEG #386303 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.885
2026 Page 8 of 14
recipient of public assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual
assault, or stalking.
(2) To discriminate against, or to harass, any person in the terms,
conditions, privileges, and protections of the sale or rental of a dwelling or
other real estate, or in the provision of services or facilities in connection with
a dwelling or other real estate, because of the race, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, age, marital status, religious creed, color, national origin,
citizenship, immigration status, housing status, or disability of a person, or
because a person intends to occupy a dwelling with one or more minor
children, or because a person is a recipient of public assistance, or because a
person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.
(3) To make, print, or publish, or cause to be made, printed, or published
any notice, statement, or advertisement, with respect to the sale or rental of a
dwelling or other real estate that indicates any preference, limitation, or
discrimination based on race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age,
marital status, religious creed, color, national origin, citizenship, immigration
status, housing status, or disability of a person, or because a person intends to
occupy a dwelling with one or more minor children, or because a person is a
recipient of public assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual
assault, or stalking.
VT LEG #386303 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.885
2026 Page 9 of 14
(4) To represent to any person because of the race, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, age, marital status, religious creed, color, national
origin, citizenship, immigration status, housing status, or disability of a person,
or because a person intends to occupy a dwelling with one or more minor
children, or because a person is a recipient of public assistance, or because a
person is a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking, that any dwelling or
other real estate is not available for inspection, sale, or rental when the
dwelling or real estate is in fact so available.
* * *
(7) To engage in blockbusting practices, for profit, which may include
inducing or attempting to induce a person to sell or rent a dwelling by
representations regarding the entry into the neighborhood of a person or
persons of a particular race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age,
marital status, religious creed, color, national origin, citizenship, immigration
status, housing status, or disability of a person, or because a person intends to
occupy a dwelling with one or more minor children, or because a person is a
recipient of public assistance, or because a person is a victim of abuse, sexual
assault, or stalking.
(8) To deny any person access to or membership or participation in any
multiple listing service, real estate brokers’ organization, or other service,
organization, or facility relating to the business of selling or renting dwellings,
VT LEG #386303 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.885
2026 Page 10 of 14
or to discriminate against any person in the terms or conditions of such access,
membership, or participation, on account of race, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, age, marital status, religious creed, color, national origin,
citizenship, immigration status, housing status, or disability of a person, or
because a person is a recipient of public assistance, or because a person is a
victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.
* * *
(12) To discriminate in land use decisions or in the permitting of
housing because of race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, marital
status, religious creed, color, national origin, citizenship, immigration status,
housing status, disability, the presence of one or more minor children, income,
or because of the receipt of public assistance, or because a person is a victim of
abuse, sexual assault, or stalking, except as otherwise provided by law.
* * *
Sec. 8. 10 V.S.A. § 601 is amended to read:
§ 601. DEFINITIONS
The following words and terms, unless the context clearly indicates a
different meaning, shall have the following meaning:
* * *
(11) “Persons and families of low and moderate income” means persons
and families irrespective of race, creed, national origin, sex, sexual orientation,
VT LEG #386303 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.885
2026 Page 11 of 14
housing status, or gender identity deemed by the Agency to require such
assistance as is made available by this chapter on account of insufficient
personal or family income, taking into consideration, without limitation, such
factors as:
* * *
(20) “Housing status” means the actual or perceived status of being
homeless, being a homeless individual, or being a homeless person as defined
in 42 U.S.C. § 11302.
Sec. 9. 21 V.S.A. § 495 is amended to read:
§ 495. UNLAWFUL EMPLOYMENT PRACTICE
(a) It shall be unlawful employment practice, except where a bona fide
occupational qualification requires persons of a particular race, color, religion,
national origin, housing status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
ancestry, place of birth, age, crime victim status, or physical or mental
condition:
(1) For any employer, employment agency, or labor organization to
harass or discriminate against any individual because of race, color, religion,
ancestry, national origin, housing status, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, place of birth, crime victim status, or age or against a qualified
individual with a disability.
VT LEG #386303 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.885
2026 Page 12 of 14
(2) For any person seeking employees or for any employment agency or
labor organization to cause to be printed, published, or circulated any notice or
advertisement relating to employment or membership indicating any
preference, limitation, specification, or discrimination based upon race, color,
religion, ancestry, national origin, housing status, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, place of birth, crime victim status, age, or disability.
(3) For any employment agency to fail or refuse to classify properly or
refer for employment or to otherwise harass or discriminate against any
individual because of race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, housing
status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, place of birth, crime victim
status, or age or against a qualified individual with a disability.
(4) For any labor organization to limit, segregate, or qualify its
membership with respect to any individual because of race, color, religion,
ancestry, national origin, housing status, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity, place of birth, crime victim status, or age or against a qualified
individual with a disability.
* * *
Sec. 10. 21 V.S.A. § 495d is amended to read:
§ 495d. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
* * *
VT LEG #386303 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.885
2026 Page 13 of 14
(16) “Harass” means to engage in unwelcome conduct based on an
employee’s race, color, religion, national origin, housing status, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, ancestry, place of birth, age, crime victim status,
or physical or mental condition that interferes with the employee’s work or
creates a work environment that is intimidating, hostile, or offensive. In
determining whether conduct constitutes harassment:
* * *
(18) “Housing status” means the actual or perceived status of being
homeless, being a homeless individual, or being a homeless person as defined
in 42 U.S.C. § 11302.
Sec. 11. 33 V.S.A. § 101 is amended to read:
§ 101. POLICY
It is the policy of the State of Vermont that:
* * *
(3)(A) Assistance and benefits shall be administered promptly, with due
regard for the preservation of family life, and without restriction of individual
rights or discrimination on account of race, religion, political affiliation, or
place of residence within the State.
(B) As used in this subdivision (3), “housing status” means the actual
or perceived status of being homeless, being a homeless individual, or being a
homeless person as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 11302.
VT LEG #386303 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.885
2026 Page 14 of 14
* * *
Sec. 12. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386303 v.2